Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB375.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1205.4 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is repealed:[Section 1205.4. CPR Instruction.--(a) School entities shall be required to offer a cardiopulmonary resuscitation 12345678910111213141516171819202122 training (CPR) class on school premises at least once every three years. The course shall be offered as an option to all employes of the school entity.(b) Completion of training, including testing of skills and knowledge, shall be documented by the signature and title of a representative of the training entity and shall include the date training was completed. Documentation shall be retained in the facility in that employe's file. Training shall be conducted by:(1) the American Red Cross;(2) the American Heart Association;(3) an individual certified to conduct CPR training by the American Red Cross, American Heart Association or other certifying agency approved by the Department of Health; or(4) other certifying agency approved by the Department of Health.(c) School districts may include this training in the continuing education plan submitted by the district to the Department of Education under section 1205.1.(d) For purposes of this section, a school entity shall be defined as a local school district, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.]Section 2. Section 1306-B(h)(4) of the act is amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:SECTION 2. SECTION 1306-B(H)(4) AND (J)(12) OF THE ACT, AMENDED NOVEMBER 12, 2025 (P.L.244, NO.47), ARE AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (J) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:Section 1306-B. School Safety and Security Grant Program.* * *(h) School Safety and Security Fund.--* * *20250SB0375PN1539 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The fund may only be used for the grant programs authorized under this article and for providing automated external defibrillators and training under section 1423.2 and no money in the fund may be transferred or diverted to any other purpose by administrative action.(4) THE FUND MAY ONLY BE USED FOR THE GRANT PROGRAMS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE AND NO MONEY IN THE FUND MAY BE TRANSFERRED OR DIVERTED TO ANY OTHER PURPOSE BY ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION, EXCEPT THAT THE COMMITTEE [MAY]:(I) MAY ANNUALLY AUTHORIZE THE USE OF UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO BE USED FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF THE COMMISSION ASSOCIATED WITH CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES UNDER THIS ARTICLE, INCLUDING FULFILLING TRAINING REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS ARTICLE, AND ARTICLES XIII-C AND XIII-E.(II) SHALL NOT LATER THAN THREE YEARS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH USE UNEXPENDED, UNCOMMITTED OR UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE FUND TO PROVIDE UP TO $2,500,000 FOR GRANTS UNDER SECTION 1423.1(F) 1423.1(G).* * *(14) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during fiscal years 2025-2026 through 2029-2030, not less than 2.5% of the money appropriated to the fund in that fiscal year shall be transferred to the department for the purchase of or providing discounts for automated external defibrillators under section 1423.2. Any amount of the money transferred by the commission to the department that is unexpended, uncommitted or unencumbered by the department by September 30 of each succeeding fiscal year must be returned to the fund.20250SB0375PN1539 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during fiscal years 2025-2026 through 2029-2030, not less than 2.5% of the money appropriated to the fund in that fiscal year shall be used for training grants for automated external defibrillators under section 1423.2 to school entities and nonpublic schools. Any amount of money that is unexpended, uncommitted or unencumbered by the commission by September 30 of each succeeding fiscal year must be returned by the fund.* * *(J) SPECIFIC PURPOSES.--THE COMMITTEE SHALL PROVIDE GRANTS TO SCHOOL ENTITIES FOR PROGRAMS THAT ADDRESS SCHOOL MENTAL HEALTH AND SAFETY AND SECURITY, INCLUDING:* * *(12) SECURITY PLANNING AND PURCHASE OF SECURITY-RELATED TECHNOLOGY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE METAL DETECTORS, PROTECTIVE LIGHTING, SPECIALTY TRAINED CANINES, SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT, SPECIAL EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT, [AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATORS,] ELECTRONIC LOCKSETS, DEADBOLTS, TRAUMA KITS AND THEFT CONTROL DEVICES AND TRAINING IN THE USE OF SECURITY-RELATED TECHNOLOGY.* * *(33) PURCHASE OF AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATORS AND TRAINING UNDER SECTION 1423.2.* * *Section 3. Section 1401 of the act is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1401. Definitions.--As used in this article--* * *(17) "Automated external defibrillator" or "AED" means a portable device that uses electric shock to restore a stable 20250SB0375PN1539 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 heart rhythm to an individual in cardiac arrest.Section 4. Section 1423 of the act is repealed:[Section 1423. Automatic External Defibrillators.--(a) The department shall establish an automatic external defibrillator program to assist school entities and nonpublic schools in making automatic external defibrillators available in school buildings.(b) On a biennial basis, the department, in consultation with the Department of General Services and the Department of Health, shall issue an invitation to bid for the cost of automatic external defibrillators and other equipment and supplies necessary for the proper operation of the device. The department shall accept the bid of the lowest responsible bidder and permit any school entity or nonpublic school to purchase the devices at the contract bid price. The department may purchase automatic external defibrillators from any funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (k) for distribution to school entities and nonpublic schools.(c) To be eligible to obtain or purchase automatic external defibrillators under the program a school entity or nonpublic school must:(1) Assure that two (2) or more persons assigned to the location where the automatic external defibrillator will be primarily housed are trained as required in subsection (d).(2) Ensure that the device will be secured in a safe and readily accessible location and agree to properly maintain and test the device according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.(3) Submit a valid prescription for the device from a licensed medical practitioner in this Commonwealth.20250SB0375PN1539 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Agree to provide the training required by subsection (d).(d) School personnel who are expected to use the automatic external defibrillator shall complete training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and in the use of an automatic external defibrillator provided by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross or through an equivalent course of instruction approved by the Department of Health.(e) A school entity may include the training required by subsection (d) in its continuing professional education plan submitted to the department under section 1205.1.(f) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator) shall apply to school employes who render care with an automatic external defibrillator.(g) From funds appropriated for this purpose, the department may assist school entities and nonpublic schools that are not equipped with automatic external defibrillators by providing a discount from the contract bid price obtained under subsection (b) or by providing automatic external defibrillators obtained under subsection (b).(g.1) The purchase of an automatic external defibrillator shall be considered an allowable use of Pennsylvania Accountability Grants under section 2599.2(b).(g.2) The purchase of automatic external defibrillators shall be considered an innovative educational program under Article XVII-F of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971."(h) (Reserved).(i) Not later than June 30, 2014, and each year thereafter, 20250SB0375PN1539 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each school entity shall make a report to the department detailing the number, condition, age and placement of automatic external defibrillators in each school building. After the initial report is made, a school entity may report this information as part of the annual report required by the Commonwealth under section 2505.1 to receive State reimbursement for health services.(i.1) A nonpublic school that participates in the automatic external defibrillator program under subsection (b) or (g) shall be subject to the reporting required under subsection (i).(i.2) The department shall annually publish a report on its publicly accessible Internet website no later than December 31, 2014, and each year thereafter. The report shall contain the following information:(1) The total number of automatic external defibrillators by school entity and nonpublic school.(2) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are equipped with automatic external defibrillators.(3) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are not equipped with automatic external defibrillators.(j) The department may adopt guidelines as necessary to administer this section.(k) The General Assembly may appropriate funds to carry out the provisions of this section.(l) As used in this section--"Automatic external defibrillator" means a portable device that uses electric shock to restore a stable heart rhythm to an individual in cardiac arrest.20250SB0375PN1539 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" means a nonprofit school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241)."School building" means a building owned by or under the control of a school entity or nonpublic school where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School entity" means an area career and technical school, a charter school, a cyber charter school, an intermediate unit or a school district."Secretary" means the Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.]Section 5. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1423.1. AED and CPR Instruction and Procedure.--(a) Each school entity and nonpublic school shall make available to it's ITS employes and volunteers instruction in the principles and techniques of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator on school premises at least once every two years. The following apply:(1) The instruction shall be offered as an option to all school entity employes and volunteers.(2) The instruction shall be conducted by any of the following:(i) The American Red Cross.(ii) The American Heart Association.20250SB0375PN1539 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) National Safety Council.(iv) An individual certified to conduct CPR training by the American Red Cross, American Heart Association or other certifying agency approved by the Department of Health.(v) Another certifying agency approved by the Department of Health.(3) A school entity and nonpublic school may provide the instruction under this section through the Internet or other electronic means.(b) The following apply to AED locations and training: INSTRUCTION:(1) EACH SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL ENSURE THAT AT LEAST ONE (1) INDIVIDUAL TRAINED AND CERTIFIED IN THE USE OF AN AED AND CPR IS PRESENT IN EACH SCHOOL BUILDING DURING EACH SCHOOL DAY.(2) EACH SCHOOL NURSE OR DESIGNEE, COACH OF AN ATHLETIC ACTIVITY, MARCHING BAND DIRECTOR, PHYSICAL EDUCATION TEACHER AND ATHLETIC TRAINER WITHIN EACH SCHOOL ENTITY MUST PARTICIPATE IN THE INSTRUCTION IN THE USE OF AN AED AND CPR.(3) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION MUST COMPLETE THE INSTRUCTION AND MAINTAIN CERTIFICATION IN THE USE OF AN AED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.(C) THE FOLLOWING APPLY TO AED LOCATIONS AND TRAINING:(1) Each school entity and nonpublic school that participates in interscholastic athletics, as defined in section 1602-A, shall ensure that at each AED location there are individuals trained and certified in CPR and in the use of an AED by an entity listed under subsection (a)(2).(2) Training must be completed and certification maintained in the use of an AED in accordance with this section.(3) Each school entity and nonpublic school that 20250SB0375PN1539 - 9 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 participates in interscholastic athletics shall ensure that the individuals trained in the use of an AED have access to the AED on the premises of the school entity and nonpublic school.(c) (D) The following apply to continuing education requirements:(1) A school entity may include the training under this section in the continuing education plan submitted to the department under section 1205.1.(2) Satisfying the education requirements of this section shall also satisfy the education requirements under section 1425(d).(d) (E) Completion of training under this section, including the testing of skills and knowledge, shall be documented by the signature and title of a representative of the training entity and shall include the date that the training was completed. The documentation shall be retained by the school entity and nonpublic school in the file of the employe or volunteer that completed the training.(e) The department, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall develop guidelines and materials that will assist school entities and nonpublic schools in the development of a cardiac emergency response plan. The department shall make the guidelines and materials available online.(f) The following apply to a cardiac emergency response plan:(1) Each school entity and nonpublic school that participates in interscholastic athletics shall develop or amend an existing cardiac emergency response plan that includes:(i) Nationally recognized evidence-based core elements or standards.20250SB0375PN1539 - 10 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) An annual review.(iii) Safety procedures to follow in response to a medical emergency involving cardiac arrest and the use of an AED.(iv) The placement of AEDs on school premises and athletic fields.(v) The number of individuals who must receive training.(2) The cardiac emergency response plan of each school entity and nonpublic school shall: (i) Provide MAKE AVAILABLE cardiac awareness information to be distributed annually to school entity and nonpublic school employes and those responsible for extracurricular activities, community group activities, summer or other programs using the facilities of the school entity.(ii) Require conducting annual sudden cardiac arrest drills with or without the participation of students to test the cardiac emergency response plan in response to a sudden cardiac arrest.(G) THE SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1302-B SHALL AWARD GRANTS TO NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS TO SATISFY THE TRAINING REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (C). THIS SUBSECTION SHALL EXPIRE THREE YEARS FROM THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(g) (H) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ATHLETIC ACTIVITY" MEANS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1425(H)."CPR" means cardiopulmonary resuscitation."Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" means a nonprofit school, other than a 20250SB0375PN1539 - 11 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public school within this Commonwealth, at which a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.)."SCHOOL BUILDING" MEANS A BUILDING OWNED BY OR UNDER THE CONTROL OF A SCHOOL ENTITY OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL WHERE CLASSES ARE TAUGHT OR EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES ARE CONDUCTED ON A REGULAR BASIS."SCHOOL DAY" MEANS THE LENGTH OF TIME THAT A CHILD SUBJECT TO COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE IS EXPECTED TO BE RECEIVING INSTRUCTION DURING A CALENDAR DAY AS DETERMINED BY THE GOVERNING BODY."School entity" means a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Volunteer" means an individual who holds an unpaid position with a school entity or nonpublic school as a volunteer for a program, activity or service and is responsible for the welfare of children or has direct volunteer contact.Section 1423.2. Automated External Defibrillator Program.--(a) The department shall establish the Automated External Defibrillator Program to assist school entities and nonpublic schools in making AEDs available in school buildings.(b) On a biennial basis, the department, in consultation with the Department of General Services and the Department of Health, shall issue an invitation to bid for the cost of AEDs and other equipment and supplies necessary for the proper operation of the device. The department shall accept the bid of the lowest responsible bidder and permit any school entity or 20250SB0375PN1539 - 12 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nonpublic school to purchase the devices at the contract bid price. The department may provide AEDs from any money made available under section 1306-B(h)(4) and (13) for distribution to school entities and may loan the AEDs free of charge to nonpublic schools. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY APPROPRIATE FUNDS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.(c) To be eligible to obtain, purchase or loan AEDs under the program, a school entity or nonpublic school must:(1) Comply with the provisions in section 1423.1.(2) Ensure that the AED will be secured in a safe and readily accessible location and agree to properly maintain and test the device according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.(d) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator) shall apply to school entity and nonpublic school employes who render care with an AED.(e) From money made available for this purpose under section 1306-B(h)(4) and (13), the THE department may assist school entities and nonpublic schools that are not equipped with the necessary number of AEDs by providing a discount from the contract bid price obtained under subsection (b) or by providing or loaning AEDs under subsection (b).(f) The purchase of an AED shall be considered an allowable use of Pennsylvania Accountability Grants under section 2599.2(b).(g) The purchase of AEDs shall be considered an innovative educational program under Article XX-B.(h) The purchase of AEDs shall be considered an eligible school safety and security expense in section 1306-B(j).20250SB0375PN1539 - 13 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The department may accept donations, including donations of equipment, for use in providing cardiopulmonary resuscitation and AED instruction to students, employes and volunteers at school entities and nonpublic schools. The following apply:(1) The department shall geographically distribute any donations to school entities and nonpublic schools for the purpose of CPR and AED instruction under section 1423.1.(2) (F) A school entity or nonpublic school may accept from the department donations received under this subsection DONATIONS, INCLUDING DONATIONS OF EQUIPMENT, for use in providing instruction to students, school employes and volunteers in the principles and techniques of CPR and operating an AED. A school entity or nonpublic school may accept other donations, including donations of equipment, for use in providing the instruction.(3) (G) To the extent that resources are available to a school entity or nonpublic school under this section, the school entity or nonpublic school may make available instruction to students in the principles and techniques of CPR and operating an AED.(4) (H) A school entity or nonpublic school may use resources other than those made available under this section to make available instruction to students, school employes and volunteers in the principles and techniques of CPR and operating an AED.(j) (I) The following apply to reports: (1) Not later than June 30, 2026 2027 , and each year thereafter, each school entity and nonpublic school shall make a report to the department , IN A FORMAT PRESCRIBED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION, detailing the number, condition, age, 20250SB0375PN1539 - 14 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 expiration date and placement of AEDs in each school building of the school entity or nonpublic school. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE SCHOOL ENTITY AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOL REPORTS TO THE SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COMMITTEE. (2) The department shall annually publish a report on its publicly accessible Internet website no later than June 30 DECEMBER 31 , 2026 2027 , and each year thereafter. The report shall contain the following information:(i) The total number of AEDs by school entity and nonpublic school.(ii) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are equipped and not equipped with AEDs.(iii) The number of athletic staff by school entity and nonpublic school that are equipped and not equipped with AEDs.(k) (J) The department may adopt guidelines as necessary to administer this section.(l) (K) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR" OR "AED" MEANS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1423.1."COMMITTEE" MEANS THE SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1302-B."CPR" means cardiopulmonary resuscitation."Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" means as defined in section 1423.1."Program" means the Automated External Defibrillator Program established under this section."School building" means a building owned by or under the 20250SB0375PN1539 - 15 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 control of a school entity or nonpublic school where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School entity" means as defined in section 1423.1.Section 1423.3. Availability and Specifications of Automated External Defibrillators.--(a) Each school entity and nonpublic school that participates in interscholastic athletics, as defined in section 1602-A, shall have an automated external defibrillator situated in such a manner that is readily accessible for students participating in interscholastic athletics and practices.(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as establishing any liability for or a cause of action against a school entity or nonpublic school or its officers , VOLUNTEERS or employes.(c) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator) shall apply to school entity or nonpublic school employes AND VOLUNTEERS who render care with an AED. (d) Each school entity or nonpublic school shall ensure that each AED is properly tested and maintained in accordance with the manufacturer's operational guidelines. Each AED in a school entity or nonpublic school shall meet the most recent minimum specifications as required by the Department of Health.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR" OR "AED" MEANS AS DEFINED IN SECTION 1423.1."Nonpublic school" means as defined in section 1423.1.20250SB0375PN1539 - 16 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "School entity" means as defined in section 1423.1.Section 6. School entities and nonpublic schools shall comply, as applicable, with the addition of sections 1423.1 and 1423.3 of the act no later than five THREE years after the effective date of this section.Section 7. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0375PN1539 - 17 - <--123456